Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2807
Proprietary function reconciliation statement; when adopted; filing; public hearing; when.

If the actual expenditures for a proprietary function exceed the estimated expenditures in the proprietary budget statement during its fiscal year, the governing body shall adopt a proprietary function reconciliation statement within ninety days after the end of such fiscal year which reflects any difference between the adopted proprietary budget statement for the previous fiscal year and the actual expenditures and revenue for such fiscal year. After adoption of a proprietary function reconciliation statement, it shall be filed with the municipal clerk and published in a newspaper of general circulation within the governing body's jurisdiction or by mailing to each resident within the governing body's jurisdiction. If the difference between the adopted proprietary budget for the previous fiscal year and the actual expenditures and revenue for such fiscal year is greater than ten percent, the proprietary function reconciliation statement shall only be adopted following a public hearing.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 7.